North Carolina, session 2025, HB1040.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
REVISING THE APPROPRIATIONS AUTHORITY OF THE PITT COUNTY-CITY OF
GREENVILLE AIRPORT AUTHORITY
SECTION 1.(a) Section 4 of Chapter 571 of the Session Laws of 1967 reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 4. The Authority shall prepare an annual budget setting forth the cost of operation and
maintenance of the airport and landing field. All anticipated revenues to be derived from the
operation of the airport and landing field shall be included in the budget. The budget shall be
delivered to the governing body of the County and the governing body of the City. The governing
body of the County and the governing body of the City are each hereby authorized to annually
appropriate and pay to the Authority one-half of the cost of operation and maintenance of the
airport and landing field field, in proportions jointly determined by the governing body of the
County and the governing body of the City. This appropriation and payment may be made from
revenues any of the following sources:
(1) Revenues derived from the operation of the airport and landing field, from
funds field.
(2) Funds derived from the sale of any land now or heretofore previously or
hereafter owned and used for landing field purposes, or from any funds legally
available therefor, provided, however, that no funds or revenues may be
derived from the levy of ad valorem taxes unless a majority of the qualified
voters in the respective County and City approve the same at an election called
and held for said purpose.purposes.
(3) Any other legally available funds."
SECTION 1.(b) Section 5 of Chapter 571 of the Session Laws of 1967 reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 5. The Authority may, from time to time, prepare and submit to the governing body of
the County and the governing body of the City a plan or plans with respect to additional land
acquisition, additional construction, enlargement or improvement to the airport and landing field
or the further equipping thereof to the governing body of the County and the governing body of
the City. enlargement, or improvement to or further equipping of the airport and landing field.
Acquisition of additional land for the use and benefit of the Authority requires the approval of
the governing body of the County and the governing body of the City after a public hearing
conducted at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing body of the County and the
governing body of the City. The governing body of the County and the governing body of the
City are each hereby authorized to acquire the additional land and to appropriate and pay to the
Authority one-half of the cost of the additional construction, enlargement and improvement to
the airport and landing field and the further equipping thereof, additional construction,
*H1040-v-3*

enlargement, or improvement to or further equipping of the airport and landing field, in
proportions jointly determined by the governing body of the County and the governing body of
the City. This appropriation and payment may be made from revenues any of the following
sources:
(1) Revenues derived from the operation of the airport and landing field, from
funds field.
(2) Funds derived from the sale of any land now or heretofore previously or
hereafter owned and used for landing field purposes, from any funds legally
available therefor, or from the proceeds purposes.
(3) Proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to Section 6 of this Act, provided, however,
that no funds or revenues may be derived from the levy of ad valorem taxes
nor may bonds be issued unless a majority of the qualified voters in the
respective County and City approve the same at an election called and held
for said purpose.Act.
(4) Any other legally available funds."
CONFORMING CROSS-REFERENCES WITHIN THE CREATION OF THE PITT
COUNTY-CITY OF GREENVILLE AIRPORT AUTHORITY
SECTION 2.(a) Section 6 of Chapter 571 of the Session Laws of 1967 reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 6. The County and the City, severally are hereby City are each authorized to issue their
notes, bonds bonds, or other certificates of indebtedness to pay as their share, one-half of share
of the cost of acquiring or grading real property to be jointly owned by the County and the City
for any airport or landing field to be constructed, enlarged, improved, maintained, equipped
equipped, or operated by the Authority, and of grading of such real property, and Authority;
constructing suitable drainage facilities suitable therefor, and constructing or reconstructing
facilities; constructing, reconstructing, or enlarging buildings or buildings; acquiring or installing
equipment equipment; or making other improvements necessary or suitable for the maintenance
or operation of such the airport, landing field, or airport facilities and to pay said obligations and
the interest thereon, facilities. The County and the City are each authorized to pay for these
obligations and the interest thereon by levying ad valorem taxes in an amount sufficient to pay
said obligations and the interest thereon when due, provided a majority of the qualified voters in
the respective County and City approve the same at an election called and held for any or all of
said purposes. Such bonds if issued by the County shall be issued pursuant to and within
limitations prescribed by Article 9 of Chapter 153 of the General Statutes, constituting the County
Finance Act, and such bonds if issued by the City shall be issued pursuant to and within the
limitations prescribed by Subchapter III of Chapter 160 of the General Statutes, constituting the
Municipal Finance Act. Each of said purposes is hereby determined to be a special purpose within
the meaning of Section 6 of Article V of the Constitution of North Carolina and a special approval
of the General Assembly is hereby given to the issuance of such obligations by the County or the
City for any of said purposes and for the levy of taxes for the payment of such obligations and
the interest thereon.taxes. Bonds issued under this section shall be issued pursuant to the Local
Government Bond Act, Article 4 of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 2.(b) Section 11 of Chapter 571 of the Session Laws of 1967 reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 11. The Authority shall have the authority to adopt reasonable rules and regulations for
the safety zoning of the airport and landing field, including the power to regulate the height of
buildings, towers, trees trees, and other obstructions within a reasonable radius thereof, radius,
in order to comply with any rules and regulations of the Civil Aeronautics Board, the Federal
Aviation Agency, Federal Aviation Administration or other successor federal agency relating
thereto. The Authority shall also have the authority to adopt reasonable rules and regulations in
Page 2 Session Law 2026-28 House Bill 1040

accordance with the Model Airport Zoning Act as provided in Section 63-29 63-30 through 63-37
63-37.1 of the General Statutes of North Carolina and shall have the authority to institute an
action in any court of competent jurisdiction seeking enforcement of the rules and regulations as
provided in Section 63-35 of the General Statutes of North Carolina."
SECTION 2.(c) Section 13 of Chapter 571 of the Session Laws of 1967 reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 13. The Authority shall have exclusive jurisdiction, control, supervision supervision,
and management over an airport, landing field, or adjoining grounds acquired under the
provisions of and for the purposes set out in this Act whether owned by the County or City. The
Authority shall have the right and is hereby empowered, empowered to spend such the funds as
that are appropriated and contributed from time to time by the County and City jointly or
severally for airport purposes purposes, and is empowered to enter into contracts and pledge the
credit of the Authority to the extent of the money appropriated and contributed by the County
and City for the purposes enumerated. The Authority is also empowered to spend or use funds
and revenue derived from the operation of the airport and all facilities connected therewith.
connected facilities. The Authority shall have authority to deal and contract with the Civil
Aeronautics Board, the Federal Aviation Agency Federal Aviation Administration or any
successor agency of the United States or any other representative or agency of the United States
relative to the acquiring, grading, constructing, equipping, improving, maintaining maintaining,
and operating of an airport or landing field established or acquired by the County and City under
the authority of this Act."
SECTION 2.(d) Section 16 of Chapter 571 of the Session Laws of 1967 reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 16. A member of the Authority shall not be considered a public officer or as a person
holding office within the meaning of Article XIV, Section 7, Article VI, Section 9, of the
Constitution of North Carolina. Any public officer of the County or the City who may be
appointed as a member of the Authority shall serve ex officio as a part of his duty as a public
officer of said County or City."
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 2nd day of July, 2026.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
House Bill 1040 Session Law 2026-28 Page 3